Hawaii, session 2026, HB625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Nationally certified school psychologist; incentive program.  (a)  There is established within the department a nationally certified school psychologist incentive program to recognize and support exemplary educational practice by offering incentive payments to school psychologists who earn the Nationally Certified School Psychologist credential from the National Association of School Psychologists.  The nationally certified school psychologist incentive program shall provide: (1)  A $5,000 bonus per year to each nationally certified school psychologist who maintains a current national certification; (2)  Up to $500, depending on the certification fee structure, upon completing all components of the Nationally Certified School Psychologist credential; (3)  A reimbursement of the remainder of the national certification application fee upon achievement of the Nationally Certified School Psychologist credential; and (4)  An additional $5,000 bonus per year to each school psychologist employed by the department who maintains a current Nationally Certified School Psychologist certificate and provides school psychology services to children in a hard-to-fill area as defined by the department. (b)  The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to offer incentive pay for the nationally certified school psychologist incentive program established pursuant to section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________